Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.200

Violations—Injunctions.

Notwithstanding any other actions which may be brought under the laws of this state, the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of any county within the state may bring an action in the name of the state against any person to restrain and prevent any violation of this chapter.

[ 1967 c 201 s 20.]